lt-LT: Vaizdo įrašo regiono kodas: 1 regionas; 2 regionas; 3 regionas; 4 regionas; 5 regionas; 6 regionas; A regionas; B regionas; C regionas; Be regiono; Kita
ja: DVDのリージョンコード: 地域1; 地域2; 地域3; 地域4; 地域5; 地域6; 地域A; 地域B; 地域C; 地域制限なし; その他
ro-RO: Cod video regional: Regiunea 1; Regiunea 2; Regiunea 3; Regiunea 4; Regiunea 5; Regiunea 6; Regiunea A; Regiunea B; Regiunea C; Fara regiune; Altele
it: Codice area geografica del video: Regione 1; Regione 2; Regione 3; Regione 4; Regione 5; Regione 6; Regione A; Regione B; Regione C; Senza regione; Altro
vi: Mã vùng video: Vùng 1; Vùng 2; Vùng 3; Vùng 4; Vùng 5; Vùng 6; Vùng A; Vùng B; Vùng C; Không có mã vùng; Khác
da: Videoregionskode: Region 1; Region 2; Region 3; Region 4; Region 5; Region 6; Region A; Region B; Region C; Regionsfri; Andet
hr-HR: Regionalni kod za videoreprodukciju: Regija 1; Regija 2; Regija 3; Regija 4; Regija 5; Regija 6; Regija A; Regija B; Regija C; Bez regije; Ostalo
nl: Videoregiocode: Regio 1; Regio 2; Regio 3; Regio 4; Regio 5; Regio 6; Regio A; Regio B; Regio C; Regiovrij; Andere
th: รหัสภูมิภาควิดีโอ: ภูมิภาค 1; ภูมิภาค 2; ภูมิภาค 3; ภูมิภาค 4; ภูมิภาค 5; ภูมิภาค 6; ภูมิภาค A; ภูมิภาค B; ภูมิภาค C; ไม่จำกัดภูมิภาค; อื่นๆ
en: Video region code: Region 1; Region 2; Region 3; Region 4; Region 5; Region 6; Region A; Region B; Region C; Region-free; Other
ko: 비디오 지역 코드: 지역 1; 지역 2; 지역 3; 지역 4; 지역 5; 지역 6; 지역 A; 지역 B; 지역 C; 지역 제한 없음; 기타
fr: Code de région vidéo: Région 1; Région 2; Région 3; Région 4; Région 5; Région 6; Région A; Région B; Région C; Région libre; Autre
pt-BR: Código de região do vídeo: Região 1; Região 2; Região 3; Região 4; Região 5; Região 6; Região A; Região B; Região C; Sem região; Outro
ru: Код региона DVD: Регион 1; Регион 2; Регион 3; Регион 4; Регион 5; Регион 6; Регион А; Регион B; Регион С; Без региона; Другой
hu: Videó régiókódja: 1. régió; 2. régió; 3. régió; 4. régió; 5. régió; 6. régió; A régió; B régió; C régió; Régiómentes; Egyéb
bg-BG: Регионален видео код: Регион 1; Регион 2; Регион 3; Регион 4; Регион 5; Регион 6; Регион А; Регион В; Регион C; Без регион; Други
sv: Regionskod för video: Region 1; Region 2; Region 3; Region 4; Region 5; Region 6; Region A; Region B; Region C; Regionfri; Övrigt
tr: Video Bölge Kodu: Bölge; Bölge; Bölge; Bölge; Bölge; Bölge; A Bölgesi; B Bölgesi; C Bölgesi; Bölgeden bağımsız; Diğer
de: Video-Regionalcode: Region 1; Region 2; Region 3; Region 4; Region 5; Region 6; Region A; Region B; Region C; Regionenfrei; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 视频区域码: 区域 1; 区域 2; 区域 3; 区域 4; 区域 5; 区域 6; 区域 A; 区域 B; 区域 C; 不限地区; 其他
pl: Kod regionu filmu: Region 1; Region 2; region 3; Region 4; Region 5; Region 6; Region A; Region B; Region C; Bez regionów; Inne
es: Código de región de video: Región 1; Región 2; Región 3; Región 4; Región 5; Región 6; Región A; Región B; Región C; Región libre; Otros
zh-TW: 影音地區碼: 1 區; 2 區; 3 區; 4 區; 5 區; 6 區; A 區; B 區; C 區; 不分區; 其他
nb: Videoregionkode: Region 1; Region 2; Region 3; Region 4; Region 5; Region 6; Region A; Region B; Region C; Regionfri; Annet
sk-SK: Kód regiónu videa: Región 1; Región 2; Región 3; Región 4; Región 5; Región 6; Región A; Región B; Región C; Bez regiónu; Iné
pt-PT: Código de região de vídeo: Região 1; Região 2; Região 3; Região 4; Região 5; Região 6; Região A; Região B; Região C; Sem região; Outro
sl-SI: Regijska koda videa: Regija 1; Regija 2; Regija 3; Regija 4; Regija 5; Regija 6; Regija A; Regija B; Regija C; Brez regije; Drugo
el: Κωδικός περιοχής βίντεο: Περιοχή; Περιοχή; Περιοχή; Περιοχή; Περιοχή; Περιοχή; Περιοχή; Περιοχή; Περιοχή; Χωρίς περιφέρεια; Άλλο
cs: Regionální kód pro video: Oblast 1; Oblast 2; Oblast 3; Oblast 4; Oblast 5; Oblast 6; Oblast A; Oblast B; Oblast C; Bez oblasti; Jiné
fi: Videon aluekoodi: Alue 1; Alue 2; Alue 3; Alue 4; Alue 5; Alue 6; Alue A; Alue B; Alue C; Alueesta riippumaton; Muu